src/morphology/stems/postpositions.lexc
LEXICON Postpositions

бол:бол Postp ;        ! topicaliser
шиг:шиг Postp ;        ! "like"
бүр:бүр Postp ;        ! "each"
өмнө:өмнө Postp ;      ! "before, until" ! FIXME: takes attr
дараа:дараа Postp ;    ! "after"         ! FIXME: takes attr
гэвэл:гэвэл Postp ;    ! CHECK
дээр:дээр Postp ;      ! "on (top of)"   ! FIXME: takes attr
дотор:дотор Postp ;    ! "in(side of)"   ! FIXME: takes attr
доор:доор Postp ;      ! "under"         ! FIXME: takes attr
тухай:тухай Postp ;    ! "about"
гадна:гадна Postp ;    ! "outside"
төлөө:төлөө Postp ;    !
тулд:тулд Postp ;      ! 
хүртэл:хүртэл Postp ;  ! "until"
хойш:хойш Postp ;      ! "since"
хувьд:хувьд Postp ;    ! "regarding"

LEXICON Postp
+Po: # ;
